Maryland, session 2025, SB0655.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
13–101.2.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
3.5–801 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(3) “OFFICE” MEANS THE ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE OF THE COURTS.
(4) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE EVIDENCE
CLINIC PILOT PROGRAM.
(B) THERE IS AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE EVIDENCE CLINIC PILOT
PROGRAM IN THE OFFICE.
(C) (1) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE EXPERTISE IN
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TO THE CIRCUIT COURTS AND THE DISTRICT COURT IN
THE FORM OF EXPERT TESTIMONY ON THE AUTHENTICITY OF ELECTRONIC
EVIDENCE THAT A COURT DETERMINES MAY HAVE BEEN CREATED OR ALTERED
USING ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE.
(2) THE PROGRAM SHALL ENGAGE COLLEGE AND UNIVERSITY
STUDENTS, RECENT GRADUATES, AND FACULTY AND TECHNOLOGY PROFESSIONALS
DEDICATED TO THE RESEARCH AND ADVANCEMENT OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
IN ORDER TO DEVELOP EXPERT WITNESS RESOURCES FOR COURTS TO USE IN CASES
IMPLICATING THE USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE.
(3) THE PROGRAM SHALL PRIORITIZE CIVIL CASES IN WHICH ONE OR
MORE PARTIES DO NOT HAVE LEGAL REPRESENTATION OR REASONABLE ACCESS TO
EXPERT TESTIMONY.
(D) (1) THE OFFICE SHALL ISSUE A REQUEST FOR PROPOSALS FOR THE
PROGRAM TO SELECT AN ENTITY TO MANAGE THE PROGRAM.
(2) AT A MINIMUM, THE REQUEST FOR PROPOSALS SHALL:

SENATE BILL 655 3
(I) STATE WITH SPECIFICITY THE GOALS OF THE PROGRAM;
AND
(II) STATE WITH SPECIFICITY THE OBJECTIVES AND
PERFORMANCE CRITERIA THAT WILL BE USED TO MEASURE THE SUCCESS OF THE
PROGRAM, INCLUDING AN ENTITY’S WILLINGNESS TO:
1. LIST THE CLINIC AS A FOR–CREDIT COURSE; AND
2. ENABLE CREDIT SHARING ACROSS INSTITUTIONS OF
HIGHER EDUCATION.
(3) IN SELECTING AN ENTITY TO MANAGE THE PROGRAM, THE
OFFICE SHALL GIVE PREFERENCE TO AN ENTITY THAT:
(I) IS A MARYLAND–BASED VENDOR;
(II) HAS AN ACADEMIC FOCUS ON COMPUTER SCIENCE AND
TECHNOLOGY RESEARCH AND ADVANCEMENT;
(III) HAS EXPERIENCE RELATING TO ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE; AND
(IV) WILL MAXIMIZE THE USE OF STATE FUNDS THROUGH THE
USE OF MECHANISMS, INCLUDING PREEXISTING MATERIALS, FUNDING
PARTNERSHIPS, AND RESOURCE MATCHING IN ADMINISTERING THE PROGRAM, THE
OFFICE SHALL:
(1) DEVELOP A GRANT APPLICATION FOR THE PROGRAM; AND
(2) AWARD GRANTS TO ELIGIBLE INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER
EDUCATION.
(E) (1) FOR FISCAL YEARS 2027 AND 2028, THE GOVERNOR MAY
INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $250,000 TO THE
PROGRAM.
(2) NOT MORE THAN 20% OF THE MONEY APPROPRIATED TO THE
PROGRAM MAY BE USED FOR ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES.
(F) THE TERMS OF THE AN AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE OFFICE AND AN
ENTITY SELECTED TO MANAGE THE PROGRAM SHALL A GRANTEE MAY INCLUDE A
CLAUSE THAT REQUIRES THE OFFICE TO HOLD HARMLESS THE ENTITY SELECTED
TO CONDUCT THE PROGRAM GRANTEE AGAINST ANY CLAIM ALLEGING LIABILITY OR

SENATE BILL 655
DAMAGES RELATING TO THE PROVISION OF EXPERTISE IN ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE AS PART OF THE PROGRAM, EXCEPT IN CASES OF WILLFUL OR
WANTON MISCONDUCT, GROSS NEGLIGENCE, OR INTENTIONALLY TORTIOUS
CONDUCT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.